Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-5502
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Residential density is beneficial in making better and more cost-effective use of municipal resources and services;

(2) There is a need for affordable housing in municipalities of all sizes in Nebraska. Affordable housing contributes to economic growth by providing housing options for workers of all levels;

(3) Following World War II, municipal zoning codes, ordinances, and regulations in Nebraska and throughout the United States prioritized detached single-family homes and mid-rise to high-rise apartment buildings over other forms of housing stock;

(4) In addition to zoning restrictions, the historic practice of redlining in Nebraska communities has contributed to a lack of affordable housing in many Nebraska municipalities;

(5) Housing stock known as middle housing, while prominent in the early 1900s, has been largely missing in the construction of new housing in the United States since the mid-1940s; and

(6) Examining and updating municipal zoning codes and ordinances to permit varied types of housing stock will provide greater availability of affordable housing, increase residential density, promote more efficient and effective land use, and create conditions for successful mass transit, bikeability, walkability, and affordability in residential neighborhoods.

Laws 2020, LB866, § 2.